District of Columbia statutes.
22-3306

Defacing books, manuscripts, publications, or works of art.

Any person who shall wrongfully deface, injure, or mutilate, tear, or destroy any book, pamphlet, or manuscript, or any portion thereof belonging to the Library of Congress, or to any public library in the District of Columbia, whether the property of the United States or of the District of Columbia or of any individual or corporation in said District, or who shall wrongfully deface, injure, mutilate, tear, or destroy any book, pamphlet, document, manuscript, public record, print, engraving, medal, newspaper, or work of art, the property of the United States or of the District of Columbia, shall be held guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction thereof, shall, when the offense is not otherwise punishable by some statute of the United States, be punished by a fine of not less than $10 and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, and by imprisonment for not less than 1 month nor more than 180 days, or both, for every such offense.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 849
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 535, ch. 1329
Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 601(d), 29 DCR 3976
Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 14(b), 32 DCR 3590
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151,§ 105(n), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(l), 60 DCR 2064

History

1981 Ed., § 22-3106.
1973 Ed., § 22-3106.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “nor more than $1,000”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(n) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(l) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes